Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Chapter 20. Landing Field Obstructions.

Secs. 02.20.010 — 02.20.040.
Registration of aircraft; registration of pilots; inspection of emergency equipment; flight plans. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.20.050.
Obstructing airports and runways.

A person may not place an object on the surface of a public use airport that because of its nature or location might cause injury or damage to an aircraft or person riding in the aircraft.

A person may not dig a hole or make any kind of excavation, or drive a sled, tractor, truck, or any kind of vehicle upon the surface of a public use airport that might make ruts, or tracks, or add to an accumulation of tracks so as to cause sufficient roughness of the surface to endanger aircraft using the airport.

All acts prohibited in (a) and (b) of this section also apply in their entirety to a temporary airport or runway that has been marked out on the frozen surface of a stream or lake for the use of aircraft.

Unless closed for public safety reasons by a notice to airmen (NOTAM) provided to the Federal Aviation Administration or by publication in the appropriate aeronautical charts and publications published by the Federal Aviation Administration, unless closed or restricted under the authority provided in AS

16.05.050

,

16.05.251

,

16.05.255

,

16.05.270

, AS

16.20.010

—

16.20.162

, or

16.20.500

—

16.20.690

, or unless closed or restricted under authority consistent with AS

38.04.200

or AS

41.21.020(e)

, navigable water in the state or a suitable landing site on public land that is not subject to a surface lease, easement, or permit issued by the Department of Natural Resources is presumed open for operation of aircraft.

History.

(§ 5 ch 43 SLA 1951; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

Sec. 02.20.060.
Enforcement and penalties.

Federal, state, and municipal law enforcement officers may enforce the provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter.

A person who violates this chapter, or a regulation adopted under this chapter, is punishable, upon conviction, for each offense by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 6 ch 43 SLA 1951)

Sec. 02.20.070.
Department defined. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]